Utah statutes.
18-1-3.   Dogs attacking domestic animals, service animals, hoofed protected
wildlife, or domestic fowls.
Any person may injure or kill a dog while:
(1)  the dog is attacking, chasing, or worrying:
(a)  a domestic animal having a commercial value;
(b)  a service animal, as defined in Section 62A-5b-102; or
(c)  any species of hoofed protected wildlife;
(2)  the dog is attacking domestic fowls; or
(3)  the dog is being pursued for committing an act described in Subsection
(1) or (2).
